Maine, session 132, LD1991.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6803, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Educational course. The commissioner, as the commissioner determines
appropriate, may require an individual to complete an educational course prior to the
issuance or renewal of a seaweed permit under this section. An educational course required
under this subsection may be provided by the department or by any public or private sector
association or organization authorized by the commissioner. If an educational course
requirement under this subsection applies only to certain species of seaweed, the
commissioner may require an endorsement on the seaweed permit for those species, which
must be made available at no charge.
Sec. 2. Report. The Department of Marine Resources shall submit a report to the
joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over marine resources
matters no later than February 1, 2028 with findings and recommendations related to the
implementation of the educational course developed pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 12, section 6803, subsection 6. The committee may report out a bill based
on the report to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature.
Page 1 - 132LR2688(03)